Massachusetts, session 194th, S1856.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Group 2 of paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the General
Laws, as amended by section 37 of chapter 39 of the acts of 2021, is hereby amended by
inserting the following words after the word “hospital”, in line 266, the following words:- ; all
full-time dispatchers, dispatch supervisors, communications center directors or communications
chiefs certified by the state 911 Department as Certified Telecommunicators as defined by MA
560 CMR 5.04
of 1